North Carolina, session 2025, HB590.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 44.
"Radiologic Technologists, Radiation Therapists, Sonographers.
"§ 90-750. Short title; findings.
(a) This Article may be cited as the "Patient Safety in Medical Imaging Act."
(b) The General Assembly finds and declares that citizens in this State are entitled to the
highest quality of care and maximum protection practicable from the harmful effects of
improperly performed medical imaging and radiation therapy procedures and that protection and
quality can be increased by requiring appropriate education and licensure of persons operating
equipment used for medical imaging and radiation therapy procedures. Therefore, it is essential
to establish standards of education for these professionals and to provide for appropriate
examination and licensure.
"§ 90-751. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Board. – The Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Board of Examiners.
(2) Bone densitometry. – The determination of bone mass by means of the
radiation absorption by a skeleton or part of a skeleton.
(3) Cardiac electrophysiology specialist. – A person who is registered to perform,
under the supervision of a qualified physician, radiographic procedures and
studies using external ionizing radiation to produce fluoroscopic images.
(4) Cardiovascular invasive specialist. – A person who is registered to perform,
under the supervision of a qualified physician, radiographic procedures using
external ionizing radiation to produce fluoroscopic images.
(5) Certification organization. – A national certification organization that
specializes in the certification and registration of medical imaging or radiation
therapy technical personnel and is accredited by the National Commission for
Certifying Agencies, the American National Standards Institute, or other
accreditation organization recognized by the Board.
*H590-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Computed tomography. – The process of producing sectional and
three-dimensional images using external ionizing radiation for diagnostic or
therapeutic purposes.
(7) Diagnostic medical sonographer. – A person who is licensed under this Article
to perform diagnostic medical sonography procedures using high-frequency
sound waves with specialized equipment to direct the sound waves into an
area of the human body to generate an image for diagnostic purposes or for
the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions.
(8) Diagnostic medical sonography. – The use of high-frequency sound waves
(ultrasound) with specialized equipment to direct the sound waves into an area
of the human body to generate an image for diagnostic or therapeutic
purposes.
(9) Fluoroscopy. – The continuous exposure of a patient to X rays in real-time
imaging of structures inside of the body during real-time procedures.
(10) Hybrid imaging. – The combination of imaging technologies that allows
information from different modalities to be presented as a single set of images.
(11) Ionizing radiation. – As defined by G.S. 104E-5(9).
(12) Licensed practitioner. – A person licensed to practice medicine, dentistry,
podiatry, nursing, or chiropractic medicine in this State.
(13) Limited practice radiographer. – A person who is licensed under this Article
to perform, under the supervision of a radiographer or licensed practitioner,
radiography or bone densitometry procedures resulting in diagnostic
radiographic images of selected specific parts of human anatomy or bone
density measurements.
(14) Magnetic resonance. – The use of radiofrequencies within a magnetic field for
diagnostic, therapeutic, or research purposes.
(15) Medical imaging. – Any procedure or article intended for use in the diagnosis
or visualization of disease or other medical conditions in human beings,
including radiography, nuclear medicine, fluoroscopy, magnetic resonance,
sonography, and other procedures using ionizing radiation or nonionizing
radiation.
(16) Medical imaging professional. – An individual other than a licensed
practitioner who has undergone appropriate training and testing by a
Board-approved certification organization to be licensed in the individual's
practicing modality.
(17) Mobile imaging. – Any arrangement in which medical imaging services are
transported to various sites. This term does not include movement within a
hospital or movement to a site where the equipment will be located
permanently.
(18) Modality. – Technologies used in the diagnosis or treatment of disease or other
medical conditions in human beings, including all of the following:
a. Diagnostic medical sonography and its specializations.
b. Magnetic resonance.
c. Nuclear medicine and its specializations.
d. Radiation therapy and its specializations.
e. Radiography and its specializations.
(19) Nonionizing radiation. – As defined in G.S. 104E-5.
(20) Nuclear medicine technologist. – A person who is licensed under this Article
to perform nuclear medicine and molecular imaging procedures using sealed
and unsealed radiation sources, ionizing and nonionizing radiation, adjunctive
medicines, and therapeutic procedures using unsealed radioactive sources.
Page 2 House Bill 590-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(21) Public member. – A resident of North Carolina who is not a licensed
practitioner, does not perform medical imaging or radiation therapy
procedures under this Article, and is not affiliated with any group or
profession that provides or regulates health care or that may, in any way,
hinder the public member in representing the interest of the public.
(22) Radiation therapist. – A person who is licensed under this Article to perform
procedures involving the administration of external source ionizing radiation
to human beings for therapeutic purposes.
(23) Radiographer. – A person who is licensed under this Article to perform a
comprehensive set of diagnostic radiographic procedures using external
ionizing radiation to produce radiographic, fluoroscopic, or digital images.
(24) Radiologist. – A physician licensed under Article 1 of this Chapter who is
Board-eligible for certification or who is certified by the American Board of
Radiology, the American Osteopathic Board of Radiology, the British Royal
College of Radiology, or the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of
Canada.
(25) Radiologist assistant. – A licensed radiographer who is additionally licensed
under this Article to perform a variety of activities under the supervision of a
radiologist in the areas of patient care, patient management, and medical
imaging procedures.
"§ 90-753. Scope of practice; limitations.
(a) The Board shall establish licensure standards for the following radiologic imaging
and radiation therapy modalities:
(1) Computed tomography.
(2) Cardiac invasive specialist.
(3) Cardiac electrophysiology specialist.
(4) Diagnostic medical sonography.
(5) Limited practice radiographer.
(6) Magnetic resonance.
(7) Nuclear medicine technologist.
(8) Radiation therapist.
(9) Radiographer.
(10) Radiologist assistant.
(b) A person licensed in medical imaging or radiation therapy under this Article may use
radioactive substances, equipment emitting ionizing radiation or nonionizing radiation for
medical imaging, or radiation therapy procedures only by prescription of an individual authorized
by the State to prescribe medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures and under the
supervision of a licensed practitioner.
(c) Individuals licensed as limited practice radiographers shall perform tasks only within
the scope of the specific permit issued to them as provided in G.S. 90-756(c)(1) under the
supervision of a licensed practitioner or radiographer and shall not perform computed
tomography, diagnostic medical sonography, fluoroscopy, mammography, magnetic resonance
imaging, radiation therapy, mobile imaging procedures, or imaging procedures using contrast
media.
(d) Individuals licensed as cardiovascular invasive specialists shall be registered and
licensed to perform, under the supervision of a qualified physician, radiographic procedures
using external ionizing radiation to produce fluoroscopic images. To qualify for a license under
this subsection, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Possess a high school diploma or equivalent.
(2) Possess a current certification in advanced cardiac life support.
(3) Complete an accredited cardiovascular technology program.
House Bill 590-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Possess current credentials as a registered cardiovascular invasive specialist
offered by Cardiovascular Credentialing International, Cardiac Interventional
Radiography, or Cardiovascular Interventional Radiography, as offered by the
American Registry Radiologic Technologists or other certification
organization as approved by the Board.
(e) Individuals licensed as cardiovascular electrophysiology specialists shall be
registered and licensed to perform, under the supervision of a qualified physician, radiographic
procedures using external ionizing radiation to produce fluoroscopic images. To qualify for a
license under this subsection, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Possess a high school diploma or equivalent.
(2) Possess a certificate or degree in health science or possess two years of
full-time work experience in diagnostic and interventional cardiac
electrophysiology.
(3) Graduate from an accredited program in electrophysiology.
(4) Possess current credentials as a registered cardiovascular electrophysiology
specialist offered by Cardiovascular Credentialing International or other
certification organization as approved by the Board.
(f) Effective January 1, 2026, all individuals licensed to perform medical imaging and
radiation therapy who perform computed tomography for diagnostic purposes must be certified
in computed tomography by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, the Nuclear
Medicine Technology Certification Board, or another certification organization recognized by
the Board.
(g) A person licensed to perform nuclear medicine technology may perform computed
tomography for attenuation correction and localization on hybrid imaging equipment.
(h) A person licensed to perform radiation therapy may perform computed tomography
or other modalities for treatment planning purposes.
(i) A person licensed to perform radiography may perform fluoroscopy and bone
densitometry.
(j) A person licensed as a radiologist assistant shall not interpret images, make diagnoses,
or prescribe medications or therapies.
"§ 90-754. Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Board of Examiners.
(a) Composition of Board. – The North Carolina Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy
Board of Examiners is hereby created. The Board shall consist of a maximum of nine members
appointed by the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The initial Board shall
be appointed within 90 days following the effective date of this section. The members of the
Board shall include:
(1) One licensed nuclear medicine technologist.
(2) One licensed practitioner who is a radiologist and supervises medical imaging
or radiation therapy professionals.
(3) One certified radiological or therapeutic physicist.
(4) One licensed radiation therapist.
(5) One licensed computed tomography technologist or radiographer.
(6) One licensed magnetic resonance imaging technologist or licensed
sonographer.
(7) One radiologist assistant.
(8) One retired medical imaging professional as public member.
(9) One licensed radiography educator.
(b) Board Member Qualifications for Appointment. – In addition to the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section, Board members shall meet the following qualifications:
(1) Each Board member shall be a resident of the State of North Carolina.
(2) The public member shall be at least 21 years of age.
Page 4 House Bill 590-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Except for the public member and the licensed practitioners, each Board
member shall have at least two years of experience performing medical
imaging or radiation therapy in the modality for which the Board member is
appointed.
(c) Terms of Office. – The terms of office shall be three years, except that the terms of
the members appointed to the initial Board shall be as follows: three members shall be appointed
for a term of one year, three members for a term of two years, and three members for a term of
three years. Vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired term only in the manner provided by the
original appointment. No member shall be eligible for appointment to serve more than two
consecutive terms.
(d) Temporary Board Exemption to License Requirements. – A person who performs
medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures and is appointed to the initial Board shall not
be required to hold a valid license issued by the Board until 12 months after the first issuance of
a license by the Board.
(e) Compensation and Expenses. – Each member of the Board shall receive per diem and
reimbursement for travel and subsistence as provided in G.S. 93B-5.
(f) Officers. – The officers of the Board shall be a chair and a vice-chair, and other
officers deemed necessary by the Board to carry out the purposes of this Article. All officers shall
be elected annually by the Board for one-year terms and shall serve until their successors are
elected and qualified.
(g) Meetings. – The Board shall hold four meetings each year, once per quarter, to
conduct business and to review the standards and rules for improving the administration of
medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures. The Board shall establish the procedures for
calling, holding, and conducting regular and special meetings. A majority of Board members
constitutes a quorum.
(h) Meeting Attendance. – A member of the Board who fails to attend three meetings in
an 18-month period shall forfeit the member's seat unless the chair, upon written request from
the member, finds that the member should be excused from a meeting because of illness or death
of a family member.
(i) Quorum. – A majority of the voting members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.
No action may be taken by the Board except by affirmative vote of the majority of those present
and voting.
"§ 90-755. Powers of the Board.
The Board shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Administer this Article.
(2) Issue interpretations of this Article.
(3) Adopt rules as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article.
(4) Establish the scope of practice for each license or permit type issued by the
Board.
(5) Employ and fix the compensation of personnel that the Board determines is
necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this Article and incur other
expenses necessary to effectuate this Article.
(6) Examine and determine the qualifications and fitness of applicants for
licensure, renewal of licensure, and reciprocal licensure. The Board may, in
its discretion, revise the licensing requirements of this Article for areas of
North Carolina that the Board deems too remote to contain enough qualified
licensees to perform medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures on
humans for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
(7) Set requirements for continuing education as a requirement for license
renewal. The Board may review and accept the continuing education and
recertification or continuing competency requirements established by a
House Bill 590-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
medical imaging or radiation therapy certification organization for license
renewal.
(8) Issue, renew, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses and carry out any disciplinary
actions authorized by this Article.
(9) Set fees for licensure, license renewal, and other services deemed necessary
to carry out the purposes of this Article.
(10) Conduct investigations for the purpose of determining whether violations of
this Article or grounds for disciplining licensees exist.
(11) Conduct administrative hearings in accordance with Article 3A of Chapter
150B of the General Statutes.
(12) Maintain a record of all proceedings and make available to licensees and other
concerned parties an annual report of all Board action.
(13) Develop standards and adopt rules for the improvement of the administration
of medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures in this State.
(14) Adopt a seal containing the name of the Board for use on all licenses and
official reports issued by the Board.
(15) Establish criteria and standards for educational programs offered in the State
on medical imaging and radiation therapy.
(16) Approve medical imaging and radiation therapy educational programs that the
Board determines meet the criteria and standards established by the Board.
"§ 90-756. Requirements for licensure.
(a) A person seeking to obtain a license for a radiologic imaging or radiation therapy
modality shall comply with each of the following requirements:
(1) At least 18 years of age at the time of application.
(2) Has a high school diploma or has passed an approved equivalency test.
(b) Limited Practice Radiographer. – In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of
this section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a limited radiologist assistant shall comply
with each of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in limited X-ray machine operation
approved by the Board.
(2) Pass an examination in limited X-ray machine operation approved by the
Board from the following examinations:
a. The American Registry of Radiologic Technologists limited X-ray
machine operator examination for limited bone density, chest,
extremities, spine, skull/sinus, and podiatric radiography.
b. The International Society for Clinical Densitometry examination in
clinical bone densitometry.
c. A certification organization recognized by the Board.
(c) Magnetic Resonance Technologist License. – In addition to the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a magnetic resonance
technologist shall comply with each of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in magnetic resonance imaging or a
course in radiography and additional educational requirements in magnetic
resonance technology approved by the Board.
(2) Possess current certification and registration in radiography from the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists or current certification and
registration in magnetic resonance from the American Registry of Radiologic
Technologists or a certification organization approved by the Board.
(3) By January 1, 2026, all applicants for a license under this subsection shall be
certified in magnetic resonance under subdivision (2) of this subsection.
Page 6 House Bill 590-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Nuclear Medicine Technologist License. – In addition to the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a nuclear medicine
technologist shall comply with each of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in nuclear medicine technology
approved by the Board.
(2) Possess current certification and registration in nuclear medicine technology
from the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, the Nuclear
Medicine Technology Certification Board, or a certification organization
approved by the Board.
(e) Radiation Therapist License. – In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of
this section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a radiation therapist shall comply with each
of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in radiation therapy approved by the
Board.
(2) Possess current certification and registration in radiation therapy from the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists or a certification organization
recognized by the Board.
(f) Radiographer License. – In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a radiographer shall comply with each of the
following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in radiography approved by the
Board.
(2) Possess current certification and registration in radiography from the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists or a certification organization
approved by the Board.
(g) Radiologist Assistant License. – A person seeking to obtain a license as a radiologist
assistant shall comply with each of the following requirements:
(1) Hold a current license as a radiographer and be currently certified and
registered as a radiographer by the American Registry of Radiologic
Technologists under subsection (f) of this section.
(2) Hold current certification and registration as a radiologist assistant or as a
radiology practitioner assistant by the American Registry of Radiologic
Technologists, the Certification Board of Radiology Practitioner Assistants,
or a certification organization approved by the Board.
(3) Submit to the Board clinical protocols signed by the supervising radiologist
specifying procedures that are performed by the radiologist assistant, levels of
radiologist supervision, and locations of practice designated by the
supervising radiologist. Updated protocols shall be submitted biannually,
consistent with license renewal. The radiologist assistant scope of practice
shall be consistent with the most recent version of the Radiologist Assistant
Practice Standards published by the American Society of Radiologic
Technologists.
(h) Sonographer License. – In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a sonographer shall comply with each of the
following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in sonography approved by the
Board.
(2) Possess current certification and registration in sonography from the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, the American Registry of
Diagnostic Medical Sonography, Cardiovascular Credentialing International,
or a certification organization approved by the Board.
House Bill 590-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(i) Cardiac Electrophysiology Specialist License. – In addition to the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a cardiac electrophysiology
specialist shall comply with each of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in cardiac electrophysiology
approved by the Board.
(2) Possess current certification in cardiac electrophysiology from Cardiovascular
Credentialing International or a certification organization approved by the
Board.
(j) Cardiac Invasive Specialist License. – In addition to the requirements of subsection
(a) of this section, a person seeking to obtain a license as a cardiac invasive specialist shall
comply with each of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in cardiac invasive procedures
approved by the Board.
(2) Possess current certification as a registered cardiovascular invasive specialist
offered by Cardiovascular Credentialing International, Cardiac Interventional
Radiography, Cardiovascular Interventional Radiography as offered by the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, or other certification
organizations approved by the Board.
(k) Computed Tomography License. – In addition to the requirements of subsection (a)
of this section, a person seeking to obtain a license in computed tomography shall comply with
each of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully complete a course of study in computed tomography approved
by the Board.
(2) Possess current certification and registration in computed tomography from
the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, the Nuclear Medicine
Technology Certification Board, or a certification organization approved by
the Board.
(l) Current Professionals at Time of Act. – The Board shall issue a license under this
Article, within two years of the effective date of this Article, to a person practicing as a medical
imaging professional, radiation therapist, or radiologist assistant if the person holds a current
license or certification in one of those respective modalities or fields issued by a medical imaging
certification organization approved by the Board.
(m) Change of Name or Address. – A person holding a license or permit issued under this
Article shall notify the Board in writing within 90 days of any name or address change.
(n) Failure to Maintain Required Certification and Registration. – Within 30 days, a
licensee shall submit written notification to the Board if the licensee meets any of the following
criteria:
(1) Fails to maintain a required certification and registration by a certification
organization.
(2) Is subject to any legal or disciplinary action other than minor traffic infractions
or is subject to proceedings for acts or conduct substantially the same as acts
or conduct that would constitute grounds for refusal to issue, refusal to renew,
suspension, revocation, or other discipline of an applicant or a person holding
license or permit under this Article by any of the following:
a. Licensing jurisdiction, whether in the United States or foreign.
b. Health care institution.
c. Professional society or association.
d. Certification organization.
e. Government agency.
f. Law enforcement agency.
g. Court.
Page 8 House Bill 590-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 90-757. Examinations.
(a) Evidence of Examination. – To meet the requirement of examination under this
Article for nuclear medicine technology, radiation therapy, radiography, radiologist assistant, or
sonography, the Board shall accept current certification and registration by a certification
organization recognized by the Board in the applicant's or licensee's modality.
(b) Limited Practice Radiographer Examination. – The Board shall use a limited practice
radiographer examination administered by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists
for persons applying for a limited practice radiographer license and permit in chest, extremity,
spine, skull/sinus, or podiatric radiography or bone densitometry testing. The Board shall
determine by regulation the examination score that constitutes successful completion.
(c) Acceptance of Chiropractic Radiologic Technologist Certification. – The Board may
accept certification and registration from a certification organization approved by the Board to
meet the requirement of this subsection for successful completion of an examination for a person
applying for a limited practice radiographer license and permit in spine radiography who works
under the supervision of a chiropractor.
"§ 90-758. Issuance of license; temporary license; display of license.
(a) Issuance of License. – The Board shall issue a license to an applicant who meets the
requirements for licensure specified in this Article and the regulations adopted by the Board,
verified by oath or affirmation, upon payment of a fee as provided in G.S. 90-761.
(b) The Board may issue a license with authorization to perform more than one medical
imaging or radiation therapy modality if the person is qualified in each modality.
(c) Temporary License. – The Board may issue a temporary license to any person whose
license or license renewal may be pending or when issuance is for providing medical imaging or
radiation therapy services to medically underserved areas as determined by the Board.
(d) New graduates awaiting national certification may be issued a provisional license for
employment purposes for a period not to exceed one year.
(e) Temporary License for Cross-Training. – A person licensed under this Article may
apply to the Board for a temporary license in an additional medical imaging or radiation therapy
modality to complete clinical experience requirements for an applicable training pathway
established by a certification organization recognized by the Board. Temporary licenses issued
for training purposes shall expire three years after issuance.
(f) Display of License; License to Be Available Upon Request. – The copy of the current
license of all license holders must be maintained at their places of employment.
"§ 90-759. Educational programs approved by the Board.
(a) In order to obtain approval by the Board, educational programs in medical imaging
or radiation therapy shall (i) be offered by a medical facility or educational institution and (ii) be
affiliated with one or more hospitals or clinics to provide the requisite clinical education.
(b) The curriculum for each course of study in medical imaging or radiation therapy shall
be no less stringent than the standards approved by the Joint Review Committee on Education in
Radiologic Technology, the Joint Review Committee on Education in Nuclear Medicine
Technology, the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs, or other
educational accreditation agency approved by the Board.
"§ 90-760. License renewal; reciprocity.
(a) Every license issued under this Article shall expire on the last day of the licensee's
month of birth in the second year following the year of issuance. A licensee who fails to renew a
license prior to the expiration date shall submit an application for reinstatement to obtain
licensure. The license shall be renewed upon the payment of a renewal fee, as provided in
G.S. 90-761, if, at the time of application for renewal, the applicant is not in violation of this
Article and has complied with any continuing education requirements pursuant to rules adopted
by the Board.
House Bill 590-Third Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) The Board shall notify a licensee at least 60 days in advance of the expiration of his
or her license. The licensee shall inform the Board of any change of the licensee's address. Each
licensee is responsible for renewing his or her license before the expiration date. Licenses that
are not renewed automatically lapse.
(c) The Board may provide for the late renewal of an automatically lapsed license upon
the payment of a reinstatement fee. The licensee shall maintain certification in his or her licensed
specialty throughout the licensure period established by the credentialing body.
(d) The Board may, upon application and payment of proper fees, issue a license to a
person who has been licensed, registered, or certified to perform medical imaging or radiation
therapy procedures in another jurisdiction if that jurisdiction's standards are substantially
equivalent to those provided in this Article and the regulations adopted by the Board.
"§ 90-761. Fees.
(a) The Board is authorized to charge and collect fees not to exceed the following:
(1) Initial, provisional, or temporary license application fee, one hundred dollars
($100.00).
(2) Biennial license fee, one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00).
(3) Temporary license fee, one hundred dollars ($100.00).
(4) Duplicate license, twenty-five dollars ($25.00).
(5) License renewal late fee, seventy-five dollars ($75.00).
(b) All fees shall be set by the Board pursuant to rules adopted under this Article. All fees
payable to the Board shall be deposited in the name of the Board in financial institutions
designated by the Board as official depositories and shall be used to pay all expenses incurred in
carrying out the purposes of this Article.
(c) All salaries, compensation, and expenses incurred to carry out the purposes of this
Article shall be paid by the Board exclusively out of the fees received by the Board as authorized
by this Article or out of funds received from other sources.
"§ 90-762. Disciplinary authority.
(a) The Board may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license or impose
probationary conditions on a license if the licensee or applicant for licensure has engaged in any
of the following conduct:
(1) Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment of
material facts.
(2) Engaging in unprofessional conduct pursuant to rules adopted by the Board.
(3) Having been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a crime
involving moral turpitude or any crime that indicates that the licensee or
applicant is unfit or incompetent to administer medical imaging or radiation
therapy procedures or that the licensee or applicant has deceived or defrauded
the public.
(4) Engaging in any act or practice in violation of any of the provisions of this
Article or any rule adopted by the Board or aiding, abetting, or assisting any
person in a violation.
(5) Committing an act or acts of malpractice, gross negligence, or incompetence
in administering medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures.
(6) Practicing as a person licensed to administer medical imaging or radiation
therapy procedures without a current license.
(7) Engaging in conduct that could result in harm or injury to the public.
(8) Being unfit or incompetent to administer medical imaging or radiation therapy
services by reason of deliberate or negligent acts or omissions, regardless of
whether actual injury to a patient is established.
(b) The denial, refusal to renew, suspension, revocation, or imposition of probationary
conditions upon a license may be ordered by the Board after a hearing held in accordance with
Page 10 House Bill 590-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Chapter 150B of the General Statutes and rules adopted by the Board. An application may be
made to the Board for reinstatement of a revoked license if the revocation has been in effect for
at least two years after the date of the Board's order revoking the license."
SECTION 2. Article 44 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section
1 of this act, is amended by adding new sections to read:
"§ 90-752. License required; exemptions.
(a) License Required. – Except as provided in this section, only a person currently
licensed under this Article may perform or offer to perform radiologic imaging or radiation
therapy procedures on humans for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes or otherwise indicate or
imply that the person is licensed to perform radiologic imaging or radiation therapy procedures.
(b) License Required for Employment. – No person or business entity shall knowingly
employ a person who does not hold a license, or is not exempt under this Article, to perform
radiologic imaging or radiation therapy procedures on humans for diagnostic or therapeutic
purposes.
(c) No Limitation or Enlargement of Practice. – Nothing in this Article shall limit or
enlarge the practice of a licensed practitioner.
(d) Exemptions. – The provisions of this Article shall not apply to the following:
(1) A licensed practitioner performing medical imaging procedures or
administering radiation therapy.
(2) A registered dental hygienist (RDH).
(3) A dental assistant I or II who has satisfactorily completed one of the following:
a. The North Carolina radiography equivalency examination.
b. Dental assisting school through an American Dental
Association-accredited program.
c. The Dental Assisting National Board examination.
d. Classification as a dental assistant II in this State under the laws
regulating the practice of dentistry.
(4) A resident physician licensed under Article 1 of this Chapter.
(5) A student enrolled in and attending a school or college of medicine or medical
imaging or radiation therapy who performs medical imaging or radiation
therapy procedures on humans while under the supervision of a licensed
practitioner, or an individual holding a license under this Article.
(6) A person administering radiologic imaging or radiation procedures as an
employee of the United States government.
(7) A person performing radiologic procedures or therapy on cadavers.
(8) A person licensed to perform radiologic imaging or radiation therapy who is
performing supervised clinical procedures in preparation for certification in
an additional radiologic imaging or radiation therapy modality who has
registered with the Board. The Board may grant this exemption for a period
not to exceed three years, and this exemption may be renewed by the Board.
(9) Chiropractic students as described in G.S. 90-142.1 and diagnostic imaging
technicians as described in G.S. 90-143.2.
(10) A licensed veterinarian performing medical imaging procedures or
administering radiation therapy, or to an individual employed by, or engaged
as an independent contractor by, a licensed veterinarian that performs a
medical imaging procedure or administers radiation therapy in the ordinary
course of their employment or engagement.
(11) An individual employed by, or engaged as an independent contractor by, a
podiatrist that performs medical imaging procedures in the ordinary course of
their employment or engagement.
(12) A certified registered nurse anesthetist performing fluoroscopy.
House Bill 590-Third Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(13) A nurse practitioner or physician assistant performing fluoroscopy.
"§ 90-763. Violation a misdemeanor; injunctive relief.
(a) Any person who violates any provision of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1
misdemeanor. Each act of such unlawful practice shall constitute a distinct and separate offense.
(b) The Board may make application to any appropriate court for an order enjoining
violations of this Article, and upon a showing by the Board that any person has violated or is
about to violate this Article, the court may grant an injunction or restraining order or take other
appropriate action."
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding the requirements of G.S. 90-754, as enacted by
Section 1 of this act, the initial appointees to the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Board
of Examiners filling the membership positions for licensed radiologist, licensed nuclear medicine
technologist, licensed radiation therapist, and licensed sonographer do not have to meet the
licensure requirements established in Section 1 of this act, provided that these initial appointees
shall apply for and obtain a license from the Board within 90 days after the Board begins issuing
licenses.
SECTION 4. Persons other than radiologist assistants who have been engaged in the
practice of medical imaging and radiation therapy and who do not hold a current registration
from a voluntary professional certification organization approved by the Medical Imaging and
Radiation Therapy Board of Examiners may continue to practice in the modality of medical
imaging or radiation therapy in which they are currently employed provided that they (i) register
with the Board on or before October 1, 2026, (ii) do not change the scope of their current
employment practice, (iii) complete all continuing education requirements for their area of
practice annually as prescribed by the Board, and (iv) practice only under the supervision of a
radiologist.
SECTION 5. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 6. No later than January 1, 2026, The Medical Imaging and Radiation
Therapy Board of Examiners shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 7. Section 1 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025. Section 2 of this
act becomes effective January 1, 2026. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 12 House Bill 590-Third Edition